Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Child Support


Upon Conception Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds and declares that:


1. Human life begins at conception;

Req. No. 3478 Page 1


2. A unique human being is created at the moment of


fertilization with his or her own distinct DNA;


3. The preborn child is a person entitled to the full and equal


protection of the laws of this state at every stage of development;


and


4. The rights and duties that attach to parenthood including,


but not limited to, the duty to protect the child from harm and the


duty of support begin at conception.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 141 of Title 43, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A biological mother may initiate a child support action upon


verified conception of pregnancy, provided the requirements of this


section are met. A support order issued pursuant to this act shall


be treated for all legal purposes as a temporary child support


order, subject to modification after the birth of the child pursuant


to Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Prior to any support order, the mother shall provide


verified medical documentation issued by a licensed physician,


Certified Nurse-Midwife, physician’s assistant, or other medical


professional authorized under the laws of this state confirming that


she is pregnant, the gestational age of the unborn child, and any


medical findings relevant to establishing approximate conception.


No support action may proceed without verified proof of pregnancy.

Req. No. 3478 Page 2


C. The date of conception shall be established using medical


documentation from a licensed physician or other qualified medical


professional providing prenatal assessments. The medical


professional shall provide a written assessment including the


estimated gestational age, any observed developmental indicators,


the approximate date of conception, and a statement that the


assessment represents the medical professional’s best medical


judgment. The court shall rely on this assessment as primary


evidence unless a more accurate date is established by clear and


convincing evidence. If conflicting assessments exist, the court


may order an independent medical evaluation and allocate costs in


the interests of justice.


D. No man shall be subject to a temporary support obligation


unless biological paternity is established. The mother may request


legally admissible DNA testing, including noninvasive prenatal


paternity testing, pursuant to Section 7700-501 et seq. of Title 10


of the Oklahoma Statutes. If noninvasive testing is not feasible,


the court may order other testing permitted by the laws of this


state. Refusal to cooperate with testing may be considered evidence


under existing parentage statutes. Knowingly false statements


regarding biological paternity shall be subject to penalties for


perjury pursuant to Section 500 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.



Req. No. 3478 Page 3


E. 1. Upon verification of pregnancy and paternity, the court


may order reasonable prenatal support including, but not limited to,


pregnancy-related medical expenses, reasonable living expenses


necessary for maternal and fetal health, childbirth preparation


costs, and prenatal care, vitamins, and medically recommended


treatments.


2. Support shall be calculated consistent with the guidelines


described in Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes to the extent


practicable and shall continue until birth, at which time the court


shall issue a standard post-birth child support order.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 142 of Title 43, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “temporary custody” and “temporary


sole custody” mean legal custodial authority to seek protective


orders, emergency medical relief, and all remedies available under


Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall not require physical


possession of the child.


B. 1. Upon issuance of any temporary pre-birth support order


pursuant to subsection E of Section 3 of this act, the preborn child


shall be deemed a deprived child for all purposes of the Oklahoma


Children’s Code and shall be under continuing court jurisdiction.


2. The biological father shall possess full parental standing,


including the right to petition for emergency temporary sole custody

Req. No. 3478 Page 4


or guardianship or injunctive or restraining relief to prevent


imminent physical harm or death to the child.


C. Any person with knowledge of imminent danger may report the


same to law enforcement or the Department of Human Services, which


shall have authority to seek emergency custody under Section 1-4-201


et seq. of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. Courts shall apply the same standards, burdens, and


presumptions applicable to protection of born children, including


the rebuttable presumption that continued life and bodily integrity


are in the child’s best interest. Courts may issue ex parte relief


to prevent imminent and irreversible harm, with an adversarial


hearing within seventy-two (72) hours. No bond shall be required.


E. Upon filing of any petition under this section, the court


shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the preborn child at state


expense with independent standing to seek protective relief. The


court may enjoin any person from removing the preborn child from


this state or facilitating conduct outside this state for the


purpose of causing harm or death to the child.


F. If paternity is disproven, the court shall terminate all


orders and require reimbursement of all costs and support paid. The


falsely accused may bring a civil action for damages, which may


include actual and punitive damages, attorney fees, and court costs.


G. If a preborn child dies from nonnatural causes after support


has been paid, all support shall be reimbursed and the father shall

Req. No. 3478 Page 5


have a private cause of action under Section 1053 of Title 12 of the


Oklahoma Statutes without a statutory cap. The reimbursement


obligation is nondischargeable and accrues statutory interest.


H. 1. Upon filing of any protective petition, the court shall


appoint a guardian ad litem for the preborn child.


2. Any person who knowingly or maliciously makes a false


statement under this act with intent to cause harm shall be subject


to civil penalties proportionate to the intended harm, including


sanctions for malicious prosecution.


3. If a preborn child dies from nonnatural causes after


jurisdiction has been established, the Department of Human Services


and law enforcement shall conduct an investigation consistent with


procedures applicable to the death of a born child.


I. Any person who pressures, coerces, or solicits the mother to


cause harm or death to the preborn child shall be subject to civil


penalties, injunctive relief, loss of parental rights, and all


remedies applicable to solicitation of harm against a born child.


Evidence of coercion may result in termination of parental rights


and protective orders.


J. Nothing in this section or Section 3 of this act shall be


construed to limit the court’s authority under Titles 10 and 10A of


the Oklahoma Statutes to protect a preborn child from abuse,


neglect, or threatened harm. When a duty, standard, or protective


measure applies to the protection of a born child, the court shall

Req. No. 3478 Page 6


apply the same duty or standard to the preborn child upon


establishment of jurisdiction under this act.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3478 BLB 1/15/2026 2:07:57 PM







































Req. No. 3478 Page 7